Hawaii, session 2025, HB1172.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the statewide longitudinal data system stores and analyzes career and technical education data it receives from all state educational systems and workforce training agencies to support research and evaluation that will improve outcomes throughout the early education to workforce pipeline.  The legislature finds that while other state agencies are included to provide data as appropriate, the determination of whether or not data from another department is appropriate is left to the department of education, the executive office on early learning, the university of Hawaii, the department of labor and industrial relations, and the department of human services. The legislature further finds that data currently collected by state educational systems and workforce training agencies does not include information from certain segments of Hawaiiꞌs workforce, such as those who are self-employed. This leaves the current workforce data incomplete.  Gathering data from tax filings of those who are self-employed will provide a more accurate analysis of Hawaiiꞌs workforce. The purpose of this Act is to include the department of taxation in the departmental data sharing to allow for a more accurate analysis of Hawaiiꞌs workforce. SECTION 2. Section 27-7, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§27-7 Departmental data sharing.  (a) The department of education, the executive office on early learning, the [University] university of Hawaii, the department of labor and industrial relations, the department of human services, the department of taxation, and other state agencies, as appropriate, shall share data through the statewide longitudinal data system to support research and evaluation that will improve outcomes throughout the early education to workforce pipeline.  The data to be shared shall be determined jointly by the department of education, the executive office on early learning, the [University] university of Hawaii, the department of labor and industrial relations, the department of human services, the department of taxation, and other state agencies, as appropriate, and shall be shared no less than annually[.], provided that any data provided by the department of taxation shall also be aggregated or anonymized. (b)  The department of education, the executive office on early learning, the [University] university of Hawaii, the department of labor and industrial relations, the department of human services, the department of taxation, and other state agencies, as appropriate, shall share data in a manner that safeguards the confidentiality of student education records, as defined by the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, and workforce data, as provided by applicable federal and state laws, rules, and regulations. (c)  The statewide longitudinal data system shall store and analyze career and technical education data it receives from all state educational systems and workforce training agencies pursuant to section 304A-304 to analyze the cross-agency longitudinal education and workforce outcomes of students who attempted an educational course, training program, career program, postsecondary program, or other state-supported workforce training program.  Data to be shared shall be determined jointly by the relevant agencies and shall be shared no less than annually. (d)  All data shared by or with the department of human services, department of taxation, department of education, public charter school authorizers, public charter schools, executive office on early learning, and other entities as required by statute shall be subject to any state or federal laws and any administrative rule regarding privacy adopted by the department or agency that collected the data. (e)  The department of education, the executive office on early learning, the [University] university of Hawaii, the department of labor and industrial relations, the department of human services, the department of taxation, and other state agencies, as appropriate, shall partner to collectively govern the statewide longitudinal data system and determine protocols to: (1)  Prioritize analyses and research questions that will provide information to improve educational and workforce outcomes and policies; and (2)  Approve requests for access to data provided by the department of education, the executive office on early learning, the [University] university of Hawaii, the department of labor and industrial relations, the department of human services, the department of taxation, and other state agencies, as appropriate. (f)  All state agency directors shall consider sharing data for the statewide longitudinal data system." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST